District of Columbia statutes.
29A-631

Repealed

Exemption of institutions of higher learning from usury law.

Repealed.

Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1936, Pub. L. 91-650, title IV, § 402
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(o), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-631.
1981 Ed., § 29-820.
1973 Ed., § 29-421.